New York, session 2025-2026, S3844.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "NYCHA real property public review act". 3 § 2. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any 4 disposition of land or buildings by the New York City Housing Authority 5 shall be subject to and shall comply with the provisions of New York 6 City's Uniform Land Use Review Procedure in addition to the provisions 7 of section 18 of the U.S. Housing Act of 1937. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04629-01-5